nama.lexd
# Определим морфологические паттерны
PATTERNS
# Лице-родо-числовые клитики
PGNMarker
# Существительные
NounStem INTSSuffix? PGNMarker?
NounStem INTSSuffix? PGNOBLMarker?
# Субстантивация
AdjStem DERtoNOMSuffix PGNMarker?
AdjStem DERtoNOMSuffix PGNOBLMarker?
# Глаголы
VerbStem VChSuffix? PGNOSuffix?
# Номинализация
VerbStem NMZSuffix OBLMarker?
# Местоимения
PronStem PGNMarker
# TAM-категории
TAMSuffix
# Послелоги
PostStem PGNMarker?
# Притяжательные местоимения и частицы
PossStem
# Ассоциативная частица
AscStem PGNMarker
# Прилагательные
AdjStem
# Адъективации
NounStem DERtoADJSuffix
VerbStem DERtoADJSuffix
# Указательные местоимения
DemStem PGNMarker?
DemStem PGNOBLMarker?

LEXICON NounStem
<hen>:honder
<father>:dada
<brother>:ǃgâ
<cow>:goma
<boy>:axa

LEXICON PGNMarker
<1p><sg><m>:ta
<2p><sg><m>:ts
<3p><sg><m>:{PGN3SGm}
<3p><sg><m>:{N}i
<1p><sg><f>:ta
<2p><sg><f>:s
<3p><sg><f>:s
<3p><sg><c>:i
<1p><du><m>:khom
<2p><du><m>:kho
<3p><du><m>:kha
<1p><du><f>:m
<2p><du><f>:ro
<3p><du><f>:ra
<1p><du><c>:m
<2p><du><c>:ro
<3p><du><c>:ra
<1p><pl><m>:ge
<2p><pl><m>:go
<3p><pl><m>:gu
<1p><pl><f>:se
<2p><pl><f>:so
<3p><pl><f>:di
<1p><pl><c>:da
<2p><pl><c>:du
<3p><pl><c>:{I}n

LEXICON PGNOBLMarker
<1p><sg><m><obl>:ta
<2p><sg><m><obl>:tsa
<3p><sg><m><obl>:{B}a
<1p><sg><f><obl>:ta
<2p><sg><f><obl>:sa
<3p><sg><f><obl>:sa
<3p><sg><c><obl>:e
<1p><du><m><obl>:khoma
<2p><du><m><obl>:kho
<3p><du><m><obl>:kha
<1p><du><f><obl>:ma
<2p><du><f><obl>:ro
<3p><du><f><obl>:ra
<1p><du><c><obl>:ma
<2p><du><c><obl>:ro
<3p><du><c><obl>:ra
<1p><pl><m><obl>:ge
<2p><pl><m><obl>:go
<3p><pl><m><obl>:ga
<1p><pl><f><obl>:se
<2p><pl><f><obl>:so
<3p><pl><f><obl>:de
<1p><pl><c><obl>:da
<2p><pl><c><obl>:do
<3p><pl><c><obl>:{I}na

LEXICON OBLMarker
<obl>:a

LEXICON VerbStem
<cry>:ā
<farm>:ǂgari
<buy>:ǁama
<have>:ūhâ
<look>:kō

LEXICON VChSuffix
<appl>:ba
<refl>:sen
<pass>:he
<recp>:gu

LEXICON PGNOSuffix
<1p><sg><m><obj>:te
<2p><sg><m><obj>:tsi
<3p><sg><m><obj>:{PGN3SGm}
<3p><sg><m><obj>:{N}i
<3p><sg><m><obj>:mi
<1p><sg><f><obj>:te
<2p><sg><f><obj>:si
<3p><sg><f><obj>:si
<3p><sg><c><obj>:i
<1p><du><m><obj>:khom
<2p><du><m><obj>:kho
<3p><du><m><obj>:kha
<1p><du><f><obj>:m
<2p><du><f><obj>:ro
<3p><du><f><obj>:ra
<1p><du><c><obj>:ma
<2p><du><c><obj>:ro
<3p><du><c><obj>:ra
<1p><pl><m><obj>:ge
<2p><pl><m><obj>:go
<3p><pl><m><obj>:gu
<1p><pl><f><obj>:se
<2p><pl><f><obj>:so
<3p><pl><f><obj>:di
<1p><pl><c><obj>:da
<2p><pl><c><obj>:di
<3p><pl><c><obj>:an
<3p><pl><c><obj>:in

LEXICON PronStem
<1p><sg>:ti
<1p><excl>:sī
<2p>:sā
<1p><incl>:sā
<3p>:ǁî

LEXICON TAMSuffix
<pst>:ge
<rpst>:go
<fut>:nî
<cond>:ga
<cond>:ka
<pst><ipfv>:ge{Space}re
<rpst><ipfv>:go{Space}ro
<prs><ipfv>:ra
<prs><ipfv>:ta
<fut><ipfv>:nî{Space}ra
<cond><ipfv>:kara
<pfv>:hâ{Space}i
<pfv>:hâ
<stati>:i
<stata>:a

LEXICON PostStem
<on>:ai
<before>:aiǃâ
<before>:aiǂama
<after>:khaoǃgâ
<as>:khami
<as>:khama
<until>:kōse
<near>:tawa
<without>:ose
<of>:xa
<from>:xu
<near>:xōri
<towards>:ǀî
<between>:ǁaegu
<to>:ǁga
<with>:ǀkha
<between>:ǁaegu
<about>:ǂama
<for>:ǃaroma
<to>:ǃoa
<against>:ǃoa-ai
<opposite>:ǃoagu
<under>:ǃgao
<over>:ǂamai
<over>:ǂamǃnâ
<into>:ǃnâ
<into>:ǃna
<through>:ǃnâ-ū
<around>:ǂnamipe

LEXICON PossStem
<poss>:di
<poss>:ti
<1sg><poss>:tī
<2sg><poss>:sā

LEXICON AscStem
<asc>:â

LEXICON NMZSuffix
<nmz>:s

LEXICON AdjStem
<big>:kai
<good>:ǃgâi
<small>:ǂkhari

LEXICON DERtoADJSuffix
<full>:xa
<lacking>:’o
<able>:sa

LEXICON INTSSuffix
<aug>:ro
<dim>:kara

LEXICON DERtoNOMSuffix
<der>:si

LEXICON DemStem
<this>:nē
<that>:nau
<what>:mâ
<same>:xā
<some>:ǀnî
